Utah statutes.
10-9a-523.   Parcel boundary adjustment.

(1)  A property owner:

(a)  may execute a parcel boundary adjustment by quitclaim deed or by a boundary line agreement as described in Section 57-1-45; and

(b)  shall record the quitclaim deed or boundary line agreement in the office of the county recorder.

(2)  A parcel boundary adjustment is not subject to the review of a land use authority.



Enacted by Chapter 334, 2013 General Session

